Tennessee, session 114, SB0149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-120-123, is amended by deleting
"ten (10) business days" and substituting "ten (10) calendar days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0149
001069
- 1 -